New York, session 2025-2026, A11007.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 548 of the laws of 2004 amending the 2 education law relating to certain tuition waivers for police officer 3 students of the city university of New York, as amended by chapter 155 4 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 6 deemed repealed July 1, [2026] 2028. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15564-01-6